Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-239.06
Contractor, defined.

For the purposes of sections 76-239.01 to 76-239.06, the word contractor shall include any firm, person or corporation who acts in the capacity of a prime contractor, subcontractor or supplier for the construction of improvements on real property.

Laws 1969, c. 612, § 6, p. 2492.